unicode_downcase.foma
#Do not edit, file automatically generated by genunicode.py
#
#For downcase:
define UnicodeDowncase 
%À -> %à || _ ,,
%Â -> %â || _ ,,
%Ầ -> %ầ || _ ,,
%Ấ -> %ấ || _ ,,
%Ẫ -> %ẫ || _ ,,
%Ẩ -> %ẩ || _ ,,
%Ã -> %ã || _ ,,
%Ā -> %ā || _ ,,
%Ă -> %ă || _ ,,
%Ằ -> %ằ || _ ,,
%Ắ -> %ắ || _ ,,
%Ẵ -> %ẵ || _ ,,
%Ẳ -> %ẳ || _ ,,
%Ȧ -> %ȧ || _ ,,
%Ǡ -> %ǡ || _ ,,
%Ả -> %ả || _ ,,
%Å -> %å || _ ,,
%Ǻ -> %ǻ || _ ,,
%Ǎ -> %ǎ || _ ,,
%Ȁ -> %ȁ || _ ,,
%Ȃ -> %ȃ || _ ,,
%Ą -> %ą || _ ,,
%𝐀 -> %𝐚 || _ ,,
%𝐴 -> %𝑎 || _ ,,
%𝑨 -> %𝒂 || _ ,,
%𝒜 -> %𝒶 || _ ,,
%𝓐 -> %𝓪 || _ ,,
%𝔄 -> %𝔞 || _ ,,
%𝔸 -> %𝕒 || _ ,,
%𝕬 -> %𝖆 || _ ,,
%𝖠 -> %𝖺 || _ ,,
%𝗔 -> %𝗮 || _ ,,
%𝘈 -> %𝘢 || _ ,,
%𝘼 -> %𝙖 || _ ,,
%𝙰 -> %𝚊 || _ ,,
%Ⓐ -> %ⓐ || _ ,,
%Ḃ -> %ḃ || _ ,,
%𝐁 -> %𝐛 || _ ,,
%𝐵 -> %𝑏 || _ ,,
%𝑩 -> %𝒃 || _ ,,
%𝓑 -> %𝓫 || _ ,,
%𝔅 -> %𝔟 || _ ,,
%𝔹 -> %𝕓 || _ ,,
%𝕭 -> %𝖇 || _ ,,
%𝖡 -> %𝖻 || _ ,,
%𝗕 -> %𝗯 || _ ,,
%𝘉 -> %𝘣 || _ ,,
%𝘽 -> %𝙗 || _ ,,
%𝙱 -> %𝚋 || _ ,,
%Ⓑ -> %ⓑ || _ ,,
%Ć -> %ć || _ ,,
%Ḉ -> %ḉ || _ ,,
%Ĉ -> %ĉ || _ ,,
%Ċ -> %ċ || _ ,,
%Ç -> %ç || _ ,,
%Ḉ -> %ḉ || _ ,,
%𝐂 -> %𝐜 || _ ,,
%𝐶 -> %𝑐 || _ ,,
%𝑪 -> %𝒄 || _ ,,
%𝒞 -> %𝒸 || _ ,,
%𝓒 -> %𝓬 || _ ,,
%𝕮 -> %𝖈 || _ ,,
%𝖢 -> %𝖼 || _ ,,
%𝗖 -> %𝗰 || _ ,,
%𝘊 -> %𝘤 || _ ,,
%𝘾 -> %𝙘 || _ ,,
%𝙲 -> %𝚌 || _ ,,
%Ⓒ -> %ⓒ || _ ,,
%Ḋ -> %ḋ || _ ,,
%Ḑ -> %ḑ || _ ,,
%𝐃 -> %𝐝 || _ ,,
%𝐷 -> %𝑑 || _ ,,
%𝑫 -> %𝒅 || _ ,,
%𝒟 -> %𝒹 || _ ,,
%𝓓 -> %𝓭 || _ ,,
%𝔇 -> %𝔡 || _ ,,
%𝔻 -> %𝕕 || _ ,,
%𝕯 -> %𝖉 || _ ,,
%𝖣 -> %𝖽 || _ ,,
%𝗗 -> %𝗱 || _ ,,
%𝘋 -> %𝘥 || _ ,,
%𝘿 -> %𝙙 || _ ,,
%𝙳 -> %𝚍 || _ ,,
%Ⓓ -> %ⓓ || _ ,,
%È -> %è || _ ,,
%Ê -> %ê || _ ,,
%Ề -> %ề || _ ,,
%Ế -> %ế || _ ,,
%Ễ -> %ễ || _ ,,
%Ể -> %ể || _ ,,
%Ẽ -> %ẽ || _ ,,
%Ē -> %ē || _ ,,
%Ḕ -> %ḕ || _ ,,
%Ḗ -> %ḗ || _ ,,
%Ĕ -> %ĕ || _ ,,
%Ḝ -> %ḝ || _ ,,
%Ė -> %ė || _ ,,
%Ë -> %ë || _ ,,
%Ẻ -> %ẻ || _ ,,
%Ȅ -> %ȅ || _ ,,
%Ȇ -> %ȇ || _ ,,
%Ȩ -> %ȩ || _ ,,
%Ḝ -> %ḝ || _ ,,
%Ę -> %ę || _ ,,
%𝐄 -> %𝐞 || _ ,,
%𝐸 -> %𝑒 || _ ,,
%𝑬 -> %𝒆 || _ ,,
%𝓔 -> %𝓮 || _ ,,
%𝔈 -> %𝔢 || _ ,,
%𝔼 -> %𝕖 || _ ,,
%𝕰 -> %𝖊 || _ ,,
%𝖤 -> %𝖾 || _ ,,
%𝗘 -> %𝗲 || _ ,,
%𝘌 -> %𝘦 || _ ,,
%𝙀 -> %𝙚 || _ ,,
%𝙴 -> %𝚎 || _ ,,
%Ⓔ -> %ⓔ || _ ,,
%Ḟ -> %ḟ || _ ,,
%𝐅 -> %𝐟 || _ ,,
%𝐹 -> %𝑓 || _ ,,
%𝑭 -> %𝒇 || _ ,,
%𝓕 -> %𝓯 || _ ,,
%𝔉 -> %𝔣 || _ ,,
%𝔽 -> %𝕗 || _ ,,
%𝕱 -> %𝖋 || _ ,,
%𝖥 -> %𝖿 || _ ,,
%𝗙 -> %𝗳 || _ ,,
%𝘍 -> %𝘧 || _ ,,
%𝙁 -> %𝙛 || _ ,,
%𝙵 -> %𝚏 || _ ,,
%Ⓕ -> %ⓕ || _ ,,
%Ǵ -> %ǵ || _ ,,
%Ĝ -> %ĝ || _ ,,
%Ḡ -> %ḡ || _ ,,
%Ğ -> %ğ || _ ,,
%Ġ -> %ġ || _ ,,
%Ǧ -> %ǧ || _ ,,
%Ģ -> %ģ || _ ,,
%𝐆 -> %𝐠 || _ ,,
%𝐺 -> %𝑔 || _ ,,
%𝑮 -> %𝒈 || _ ,,
%𝓖 -> %𝓰 || _ ,,
%𝔊 -> %𝔤 || _ ,,
%𝔾 -> %𝕘 || _ ,,
%𝕲 -> %𝖌 || _ ,,
%𝖦 -> %𝗀 || _ ,,
%𝗚 -> %𝗴 || _ ,,
%𝘎 -> %𝘨 || _ ,,
%𝙂 -> %𝙜 || _ ,,
%𝙶 -> %𝚐 || _ ,,
%Ⓖ -> %ⓖ || _ ,,
%Ĥ -> %ĥ || _ ,,
%Ḣ -> %ḣ || _ ,,
%Ḧ -> %ḧ || _ ,,
%Ȟ -> %ȟ || _ ,,
%Ḩ -> %ḩ || _ ,,
%𝐇 -> %𝐡 || _ ,,
%𝑯 -> %𝒉 || _ ,,
%𝓗 -> %𝓱 || _ ,,
%𝕳 -> %𝖍 || _ ,,
%𝖧 -> %𝗁 || _ ,,
%𝗛 -> %𝗵 || _ ,,
%𝘏 -> %𝘩 || _ ,,
%𝙃 -> %𝙝 || _ ,,
%𝙷 -> %𝚑 || _ ,,
%Ⓗ -> %ⓗ || _ ,,
%Ì -> %ì || _ ,,
%Î -> %î || _ ,,
%Ĩ -> %ĩ || _ ,,
%Ī -> %ī || _ ,,
%Ĭ -> %ĭ || _ ,,
%Ï -> %ï || _ ,,
%Ḯ -> %ḯ || _ ,,
%Ỉ -> %ỉ || _ ,,
%Ǐ -> %ǐ || _ ,,
%Ȉ -> %ȉ || _ ,,
%Ȋ -> %ȋ || _ ,,
%Į -> %į || _ ,,
%𝐈 -> %𝐢 || _ ,,
%𝐼 -> %𝑖 || _ ,,
%𝑰 -> %𝒊 || _ ,,
%𝓘 -> %𝓲 || _ ,,
%𝕀 -> %𝕚 || _ ,,
%𝕴 -> %𝖎 || _ ,,
%𝖨 -> %𝗂 || _ ,,
%𝗜 -> %𝗶 || _ ,,
%𝘐 -> %𝘪 || _ ,,
%𝙄 -> %𝙞 || _ ,,
%𝙸 -> %𝚒 || _ ,,
%Ⓘ -> %ⓘ || _ ,,
%Ĵ -> %ĵ || _ ,,
%𝐉 -> %𝐣 || _ ,,
%𝐽 -> %𝑗 || _ ,,
%𝑱 -> %𝒋 || _ ,,
%𝒥 -> %𝒿 || _ ,,
%𝓙 -> %𝓳 || _ ,,
%𝔍 -> %𝔧 || _ ,,
%𝕁 -> %𝕛 || _ ,,
%𝕵 -> %𝖏 || _ ,,
%𝖩 -> %𝗃 || _ ,,
%𝗝 -> %𝗷 || _ ,,
%𝘑 -> %𝘫 || _ ,,
%𝙅 -> %𝙟 || _ ,,
%𝙹 -> %𝚓 || _ ,,
%Ⓙ -> %ⓙ || _ ,,
%Ḱ -> %ḱ || _ ,,
%Ǩ -> %ǩ || _ ,,
%Ķ -> %ķ || _ ,,
%𝐊 -> %𝐤 || _ ,,
%𝐾 -> %𝑘 || _ ,,
%𝑲 -> %𝒌 || _ ,,
%𝒦 -> %𝓀 || _ ,,
%𝓚 -> %𝓴 || _ ,,
%𝔎 -> %𝔨 || _ ,,
%𝕂 -> %𝕜 || _ ,,
%𝕶 -> %𝖐 || _ ,,
%𝖪 -> %𝗄 || _ ,,
%𝗞 -> %𝗸 || _ ,,
%𝘒 -> %𝘬 || _ ,,
%𝙆 -> %𝙠 || _ ,,
%𝙺 -> %𝚔 || _ ,,
%Ⓚ -> %ⓚ || _ ,,
%Ļ -> %ļ || _ ,,
%𝐋 -> %𝐥 || _ ,,
%𝐿 -> %𝑙 || _ ,,
%𝑳 -> %𝒍 || _ ,,
%𝓛 -> %𝓵 || _ ,,
%𝔏 -> %𝔩 || _ ,,
%𝕃 -> %𝕝 || _ ,,
%𝕷 -> %𝖑 || _ ,,
%𝖫 -> %𝗅 || _ ,,
%𝗟 -> %𝗹 || _ ,,
%𝘓 -> %𝘭 || _ ,,
%𝙇 -> %𝙡 || _ ,,
%𝙻 -> %𝚕 || _ ,,
%Ⓛ -> %ⓛ || _ ,,
%Ḿ -> %ḿ || _ ,,
%Ṁ -> %ṁ || _ ,,
%𝐌 -> %𝐦 || _ ,,
%𝑀 -> %𝑚 || _ ,,
%𝑴 -> %𝒎 || _ ,,
%𝓜 -> %𝓶 || _ ,,
%𝔐 -> %𝔪 || _ ,,
%𝕄 -> %𝕞 || _ ,,
%𝕸 -> %𝖒 || _ ,,
%𝖬 -> %𝗆 || _ ,,
%𝗠 -> %𝗺 || _ ,,
%𝘔 -> %𝘮 || _ ,,
%𝙈 -> %𝙢 || _ ,,
%𝙼 -> %𝚖 || _ ,,
%Ⓜ -> %ⓜ || _ ,,
%Ǹ -> %ǹ || _ ,,
%Ń -> %ń || _ ,,
%Ñ -> %ñ || _ ,,
%Ṅ -> %ṅ || _ ,,
%Ņ -> %ņ || _ ,,
%𝐍 -> %𝐧 || _ ,,
%𝑁 -> %𝑛 || _ ,,
%𝑵 -> %𝒏 || _ ,,
%𝒩 -> %𝓃 || _ ,,
%𝓝 -> %𝓷 || _ ,,
%𝔑 -> %𝔫 || _ ,,
%𝕹 -> %𝖓 || _ ,,
%𝖭 -> %𝗇 || _ ,,
%𝗡 -> %𝗻 || _ ,,
%𝘕 -> %𝘯 || _ ,,
%𝙉 -> %𝙣 || _ ,,
%𝙽 -> %𝚗 || _ ,,
%Ⓝ -> %ⓝ || _ ,,
%Ò -> %ò || _ ,,
%Õ -> %õ || _ ,,
%Ṍ -> %ṍ || _ ,,
%Ȭ -> %ȭ || _ ,,
%Ṏ -> %ṏ || _ ,,
%Ō -> %ō || _ ,,
%Ṑ -> %ṑ || _ ,,
%Ṓ -> %ṓ || _ ,,
%Ǭ -> %ǭ || _ ,,
%Ŏ -> %ŏ || _ ,,
%Ȯ -> %ȯ || _ ,,
%Ȱ -> %ȱ || _ ,,
%Ö -> %ö || _ ,,
%Ȫ -> %ȫ || _ ,,
%Ỏ -> %ỏ || _ ,,
%Ő -> %ő || _ ,,
%Ǒ -> %ǒ || _ ,,
%Ȍ -> %ȍ || _ ,,
%Ȏ -> %ȏ || _ ,,
%Ǫ -> %ǫ || _ ,,
%Ǭ -> %ǭ || _ ,,
%𝐎 -> %𝐨 || _ ,,
%𝑂 -> %𝑜 || _ ,,
%𝑶 -> %𝒐 || _ ,,
%𝓞 -> %𝓸 || _ ,,
%𝔒 -> %𝔬 || _ ,,
%𝕆 -> %𝕠 || _ ,,
%𝕺 -> %𝖔 || _ ,,
%𝖮 -> %𝗈 || _ ,,
%𝗢 -> %𝗼 || _ ,,
%𝘖 -> %𝘰 || _ ,,
%𝙊 -> %𝙤 || _ ,,
%𝙾 -> %𝚘 || _ ,,
%Ⓞ -> %ⓞ || _ ,,
%Ṕ -> %ṕ || _ ,,
%Ṗ -> %ṗ || _ ,,
%𝐏 -> %𝐩 || _ ,,
%𝑃 -> %𝑝 || _ ,,
%𝑷 -> %𝒑 || _ ,,
%𝒫 -> %𝓅 || _ ,,
%𝓟 -> %𝓹 || _ ,,
%𝔓 -> %𝔭 || _ ,,
%𝕻 -> %𝖕 || _ ,,
%𝖯 -> %𝗉 || _ ,,
%𝗣 -> %𝗽 || _ ,,
%𝘗 -> %𝘱 || _ ,,
%𝙋 -> %𝙥 || _ ,,
%𝙿 -> %𝚙 || _ ,,
%Ⓟ -> %ⓟ || _ ,,
%𝐐 -> %𝐪 || _ ,,
%𝑄 -> %𝑞 || _ ,,
%𝑸 -> %𝒒 || _ ,,
%𝒬 -> %𝓆 || _ ,,
%𝓠 -> %𝓺 || _ ,,
%𝔔 -> %𝔮 || _ ,,
%𝕼 -> %𝖖 || _ ,,
%𝖰 -> %𝗊 || _ ,,
%𝗤 -> %𝗾 || _ ,,
%𝘘 -> %𝘲 || _ ,,
%𝙌 -> %𝙦 || _ ,,
%𝚀 -> %𝚚 || _ ,,
%Ⓠ -> %ⓠ || _ ,,
%Ṙ -> %ṙ || _ ,,
%Ȑ -> %ȑ || _ ,,
%Ȓ -> %ȓ || _ ,,
%Ŗ -> %ŗ || _ ,,
%𝐑 -> %𝐫 || _ ,,
%𝑅 -> %𝑟 || _ ,,
%𝑹 -> %𝒓 || _ ,,
%𝓡 -> %𝓻 || _ ,,
%𝕽 -> %𝖗 || _ ,,
%𝖱 -> %𝗋 || _ ,,
%𝗥 -> %𝗿 || _ ,,
%𝘙 -> %𝘳 || _ ,,
%𝙍 -> %𝙧 || _ ,,
%𝚁 -> %𝚛 || _ ,,
%Ⓡ -> %ⓡ || _ ,,
%Ś -> %ś || _ ,,
%Ṥ -> %ṥ || _ ,,
%Ŝ -> %ŝ || _ ,,
%Ṡ -> %ṡ || _ ,,
%Ș -> %ș || _ ,,
%Ş -> %ş || _ ,,
%𝐒 -> %𝐬 || _ ,,
%𝑆 -> %𝑠 || _ ,,
%𝑺 -> %𝒔 || _ ,,
%𝒮 -> %𝓈 || _ ,,
%𝓢 -> %𝓼 || _ ,,
%𝔖 -> %𝔰 || _ ,,
%𝕊 -> %𝕤 || _ ,,
%𝕾 -> %𝖘 || _ ,,
%𝖲 -> %𝗌 || _ ,,
%𝗦 -> %𝘀 || _ ,,
%𝘚 -> %𝘴 || _ ,,
%𝙎 -> %𝙨 || _ ,,
%𝚂 -> %𝚜 || _ ,,
%Ⓢ -> %ⓢ || _ ,,
%Ṫ -> %ṫ || _ ,,
%Ț -> %ț || _ ,,
%Ţ -> %ţ || _ ,,
%𝐓 -> %𝐭 || _ ,,
%𝑇 -> %𝑡 || _ ,,
%𝑻 -> %𝒕 || _ ,,
%𝒯 -> %𝓉 || _ ,,
%𝓣 -> %𝓽 || _ ,,
%𝔗 -> %𝔱 || _ ,,
%𝕋 -> %𝕥 || _ ,,
%𝕿 -> %𝖙 || _ ,,
%𝖳 -> %𝗍 || _ ,,
%𝗧 -> %𝘁 || _ ,,
%𝘛 -> %𝘵 || _ ,,
%𝙏 -> %𝙩 || _ ,,
%𝚃 -> %𝚝 || _ ,,
%Ⓣ -> %ⓣ || _ ,,
%Ù -> %ù || _ ,,
%Û -> %û || _ ,,
%Ũ -> %ũ || _ ,,
%Ṹ -> %ṹ || _ ,,
%Ū -> %ū || _ ,,
%Ṻ -> %ṻ || _ ,,
%Ŭ -> %ŭ || _ ,,
%Ü -> %ü || _ ,,
%Ǜ -> %ǜ || _ ,,
%Ǘ -> %ǘ || _ ,,
%Ǖ -> %ǖ || _ ,,
%Ǚ -> %ǚ || _ ,,
%Ủ -> %ủ || _ ,,
%Ű -> %ű || _ ,,
%Ǔ -> %ǔ || _ ,,
%Ȕ -> %ȕ || _ ,,
%Ȗ -> %ȗ || _ ,,
%Ų -> %ų || _ ,,
%𝐔 -> %𝐮 || _ ,,
%𝑈 -> %𝑢 || _ ,,
%𝑼 -> %𝒖 || _ ,,
%𝒰 -> %𝓊 || _ ,,
%𝓤 -> %𝓾 || _ ,,
%𝔘 -> %𝔲 || _ ,,
%𝕌 -> %𝕦 || _ ,,
%𝖀 -> %𝖚 || _ ,,
%𝖴 -> %𝗎 || _ ,,
%𝗨 -> %𝘂 || _ ,,
%𝘜 -> %𝘶 || _ ,,
%𝙐 -> %𝙪 || _ ,,
%𝚄 -> %𝚞 || _ ,,
%Ⓤ -> %ⓤ || _ ,,
%Ṽ -> %ṽ || _ ,,
%𝐕 -> %𝐯 || _ ,,
%𝑉 -> %𝑣 || _ ,,
%𝑽 -> %𝒗 || _ ,,
%𝒱 -> %𝓋 || _ ,,
%𝓥 -> %𝓿 || _ ,,
%𝔙 -> %𝔳 || _ ,,
%𝕍 -> %𝕧 || _ ,,
%𝖁 -> %𝖛 || _ ,,
%𝖵 -> %𝗏 || _ ,,
%𝗩 -> %𝘃 || _ ,,
%𝘝 -> %𝘷 || _ ,,
%𝙑 -> %𝙫 || _ ,,
%𝚅 -> %𝚟 || _ ,,
%Ⓥ -> %ⓥ || _ ,,
%Ẁ -> %ẁ || _ ,,
%Ẃ -> %ẃ || _ ,,
%Ŵ -> %ŵ || _ ,,
%Ẇ -> %ẇ || _ ,,
%Ẅ -> %ẅ || _ ,,
%𝐖 -> %𝐰 || _ ,,
%𝑊 -> %𝑤 || _ ,,
%𝑾 -> %𝒘 || _ ,,
%𝒲 -> %𝓌 || _ ,,
%𝓦 -> %𝔀 || _ ,,
%𝔚 -> %𝔴 || _ ,,
%𝕎 -> %𝕨 || _ ,,
%𝖂 -> %𝖜 || _ ,,
%𝖶 -> %𝗐 || _ ,,
%𝗪 -> %𝘄 || _ ,,
%𝘞 -> %𝘸 || _ ,,
%𝙒 -> %𝙬 || _ ,,
%𝚆 -> %𝚠 || _ ,,
%Ⓦ -> %ⓦ || _ ,,
%Ẋ -> %ẋ || _ ,,
%Ẍ -> %ẍ || _ ,,
%𝐗 -> %𝐱 || _ ,,
%𝑋 -> %𝑥 || _ ,,
%𝑿 -> %𝒙 || _ ,,
%𝒳 -> %𝓍 || _ ,,
%𝓧 -> %𝔁 || _ ,,
%𝔛 -> %𝔵 || _ ,,
%𝕏 -> %𝕩 || _ ,,
%𝖃 -> %𝖝 || _ ,,
%𝖷 -> %𝗑 || _ ,,
%𝗫 -> %𝘅 || _ ,,
%𝘟 -> %𝘹 || _ ,,
%𝙓 -> %𝙭 || _ ,,
%𝚇 -> %𝚡 || _ ,,
%Ⓧ -> %ⓧ || _ ,,
%Ỳ -> %ỳ || _ ,,
%Ŷ -> %ŷ || _ ,,
%Ỹ -> %ỹ || _ ,,
%Ȳ -> %ȳ || _ ,,
%Ẏ -> %ẏ || _ ,,
%Ÿ -> %ÿ || _ ,,
%Ỷ -> %ỷ || _ ,,
%𝐘 -> %𝐲 || _ ,,
%𝑌 -> %𝑦 || _ ,,
%𝒀 -> %𝒚 || _ ,,
%𝒴 -> %𝓎 || _ ,,
%𝓨 -> %𝔂 || _ ,,
%𝔜 -> %𝔶 || _ ,,
%𝕐 -> %𝕪 || _ ,,
%𝖄 -> %𝖞 || _ ,,
%𝖸 -> %𝗒 || _ ,,
%𝗬 -> %𝘆 || _ ,,
%𝘠 -> %𝘺 || _ ,,
%𝙔 -> %𝙮 || _ ,,
%𝚈 -> %𝚢 || _ ,,
%Ⓨ -> %ⓨ || _ ,,
%Ź -> %ź || _ ,,
%Ẑ -> %ẑ || _ ,,
%Ż -> %ż || _ ,,
%𝐙 -> %𝐳 || _ ,,
%𝑍 -> %𝑧 || _ ,,
%𝒁 -> %𝒛 || _ ,,
%𝒵 -> %𝓏 || _ ,,
%𝓩 -> %𝔃 || _ ,,
%𝖅 -> %𝖟 || _ ,,
%𝖹 -> %𝗓 || _ ,,
%𝗭 -> %𝘇 || _ ,,
%𝘡 -> %𝘻 || _ ,,
%𝙕 -> %𝙯 || _ ,,
%𝚉 -> %𝚣 || _ ,,
%Ⓩ -> %ⓩ || _ ,,
%Ø -> %ø || _ ,,
%Đ -> %đ || _ ,,
%Ħ -> %ħ || _ ,,
%Ł -> %ł || _ ,,
%Ŋ -> %ŋ || _ ,,
%Œ -> %œ || _ ,,
%Ŧ -> %ŧ || _ ,,
%Ƀ -> %ƀ || _ ,,
%Ɓ -> %ɓ || _ ,,
%Ƃ -> %ƃ || _ ,,
%Ƅ -> %ƅ || _ ,,
%Ɔ -> %ɔ || _ ,,
%Ƈ -> %ƈ || _ ,,
%Ɖ -> %ɖ || _ ,,
%Ɗ -> %ɗ || _ ,,
%Ƌ -> %ƌ || _ ,,
%Ǝ -> %ǝ || _ ,,
%Ə -> %ə || _ ,,
%Ɛ -> %ɛ || _ ,,
%Ɠ -> %ɠ || _ ,,
%Ɣ -> %ɣ || _ ,,
%Ƕ -> %ƕ || _ ,,
%Ɩ -> %ɩ || _ ,,
%Ɨ -> %ɨ || _ ,,
%Ƙ -> %ƙ || _ ,,
%Ƚ -> %ƚ || _ ,,
%Ƛ -> %ƛ || _ ,,
%Ɯ -> %ɯ || _ ,,
%Ɲ -> %ɲ || _ ,,
%Ƞ -> %ƞ || _ ,,
%Ɵ -> %ɵ || _ ,,
%Ƣ -> %ƣ || _ ,,
%Ƥ -> %ƥ || _ ,,
%Ʀ -> %ʀ || _ ,,
%Ƨ -> %ƨ || _ ,,
%Ʃ -> %ʃ || _ ,,
%Ƭ -> %ƭ || _ ,,
%Ʈ -> %ʈ || _ ,,
%Ʊ -> %ʊ || _ ,,
%Ʋ -> %ʋ || _ ,,
%Ƴ -> %ƴ || _ ,,
%Ƶ -> %ƶ || _ ,,
%Ʒ -> %ʒ || _ ,,
%Ƹ -> %ƹ || _ ,,
%Ƽ -> %ƽ || _ ,,
%Ǥ -> %ǥ || _ ,,
%Ȝ -> %ȝ || _ ,,
%Ȣ -> %ȣ || _ ,,
%Ȥ -> %ȥ || _ ,,
%Ⱥ -> %ⱥ || _ ,,
%Ȼ -> %ȼ || _ ,,
%Ⱦ -> %ⱦ || _ ,,
%Ȿ -> %ȿ || _ ,,
%Ɀ -> %ɀ || _ ,,
%Ɂ -> %ɂ || _ ,,
%Ʉ -> %ʉ || _ ,,
%Ʌ -> %ʌ || _ ,,
%Ɇ -> %ɇ || _ ,,
%Ɉ -> %ɉ || _ ,,
%Ɋ -> %ɋ || _ ,,
%Ɍ -> %ɍ || _ ,,
%Ɏ -> %ɏ || _ ,,
%Ɐ -> %ɐ || _ ,,
%Ɑ -> %ɑ || _ ,,
%Ɒ -> %ɒ || _ ,,
%Ɜ -> %ɜ || _ ,,
%Ɡ -> %ɡ || _ ,,
%Ɤ -> %ɤ || _ ,,
%Ɥ -> %ɥ || _ ,,
%Ɦ -> %ɦ || _ ,,
%Ɪ -> %ɪ || _ ,,
%Ɫ -> %ɫ || _ ,,
%Ɬ -> %ɬ || _ ,,
%Ɱ -> %ɱ || _ ,,
%Ɽ -> %ɽ || _ ,,
%Ʂ -> %ʂ || _ ,,
%Ʇ -> %ʇ || _ ,,
%Ʝ -> %ʝ || _ ,,
%Ʞ -> %ʞ || _ ,,
%Ａ -> %ａ || _ ,,
%Ｂ -> %ｂ || _ ,,
%Ｃ -> %ｃ || _ ,,
%Ｄ -> %ｄ || _ ,,
%Ｅ -> %ｅ || _ ,,
%Ｆ -> %ｆ || _ ,,
%Ｇ -> %ｇ || _ ,,
%Ｈ -> %ｈ || _ ,,
%Ｉ -> %ｉ || _ ,,
%Ｊ -> %ｊ || _ ,,
%Ｋ -> %ｋ || _ ,,
%Ｌ -> %ｌ || _ ,,
%Ｍ -> %ｍ || _ ,,
%Ｎ -> %ｎ || _ ,,
%Ｏ -> %ｏ || _ ,,
%Ｐ -> %ｐ || _ ,,
%Ｑ -> %ｑ || _ ,,
%Ｒ -> %ｒ || _ ,,
%Ｓ -> %ｓ || _ ,,
%Ｔ -> %ｔ || _ ,,
%Ｕ -> %ｕ || _ ,,
%Ｖ -> %ｖ || _ ,,
%Ｗ -> %ｗ || _ ,,
%Ｘ -> %ｘ || _ ,,
%Ｙ -> %ｙ || _ ,,
%Ｚ -> %ｚ || _ ;
